Illinois, session 104th, HB2426.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 3-6 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/3-6)  (from Ch. 38, par. 3-6)7    Sec. 3-6. Extended limitations. The period within which a 8prosecution must be commenced under the provisions of Section 93-5 or other applicable statute is extended under the 10following conditions:11    (a) A prosecution for theft involving a breach of a 12fiduciary obligation to the aggrieved person may be commenced 13as follows:14        (1) If the aggrieved person is a minor or a person 15    under legal disability, then during the minority or legal 16    disability or within one year after the termination 17    thereof.18        (2) In any other instance, within one year after the 19    discovery of the offense by an aggrieved person, or by a 20    person who has legal capacity to represent an aggrieved 21    person or has a legal duty to report the offense, and is 22    not himself or herself a party to the offense; or in the 23    absence of such discovery, within one year after the   HB2426- 2 -LRB104 10274 RLC 20348 b1    proper prosecuting officer becomes aware of the offense. 2    However, in no such case is the period of limitation so 3    extended more than 3 years beyond the expiration of the 4    period otherwise applicable.5    (b) A prosecution for any offense based upon misconduct in 6office by a public officer or employee may be commenced within 7one year after discovery of the offense by a person having a 8legal duty to report such offense, or in the absence of such 9discovery, within one year after the proper prosecuting 10officer becomes aware of the offense. However, in no such case 11is the period of limitation so extended more than 3 years 12beyond the expiration of the period otherwise applicable.13    (b-5) When the victim is under 18 years of age at the time 14of the offense, a prosecution for involuntary servitude, 15involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in 16persons and related offenses under Section 10-9 of this Code 17may be commenced within 25 years of the victim attaining the 18age of 18 years.19    (b-6) When the victim is 18 years of age or over at the 20time of the offense, a prosecution for involuntary servitude, 21involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in 22persons and related offenses under Section 10-9 of this Code 23may be commenced within 25 years after the commission of the 24offense. 25    (b-7) When the victim is under 18 years of age at the time 26of the offense, a prosecution for female genital mutilation   HB2426- 3 -LRB104 10274 RLC 20348 b1may be commenced at any time. 2    (c) (Blank).3    (d) A prosecution for child pornography, aggravated child 4pornography, indecent solicitation of a child, soliciting for 5a juvenile prostitute, juvenile pimping, exploitation of a 6child, or promoting juvenile prostitution except for keeping a 7place of juvenile prostitution may be commenced within one 8year of the victim attaining the age of 18 years. However, in 9no such case shall the time period for prosecution expire 10sooner than 3 years after the commission of the offense.11    (e) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (j), a 12prosecution for any offense involving sexual conduct or sexual 13penetration, as defined in Section 11-0.1 of this Code, where 14the defendant was within a professional or fiduciary 15relationship or a purported professional or fiduciary 16relationship with the victim at the time of the commission of 17the offense may be commenced within one year after the 18discovery of the offense by the victim.19    (f) A prosecution for any offense set forth in Section 44 20of the Environmental Protection Act may be commenced within 5 21years after the discovery of such an offense by a person or 22agency having the legal duty to report the offense or in the 23absence of such discovery, within 5 years after the proper 24prosecuting officer becomes aware of the offense.25    (f-5) A prosecution for any offense set forth in Section 2616-30 of this Code may be commenced within 5 years after the   HB2426- 4 -LRB104 10274 RLC 20348 b1discovery of the offense by the victim of that offense. 2    (g) (Blank).3    (h) (Blank).4    (i) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (j), a 5prosecution for criminal sexual assault, aggravated criminal 6sexual assault, or aggravated criminal sexual abuse may be 7commenced at any time. If the victim consented to the 8collection of evidence using an Illinois State Police Sexual 9Assault Evidence Collection Kit under the Sexual Assault 10Survivors Emergency Treatment Act, it shall constitute 11reporting for purposes of this Section.12    Nothing in this subdivision (i) shall be construed to 13shorten a period within which a prosecution must be commenced 14under any other provision of this Section.15    (i-5) A prosecution for armed robbery, home invasion, 16kidnapping, or aggravated kidnaping may be commenced within 10 17years of the commission of the offense if it arises out of the 18same course of conduct and meets the criteria under one of the 19offenses in subsection (i) of this Section. 20    (j) (1) When the victim is under 18 years of age at the 21time of the offense, a prosecution for criminal sexual 22assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, predatory 23criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal sexual 24abuse, felony criminal sexual abuse, or female genital 25mutilation may be commenced at any time.26    (2) When in circumstances other than as described in   HB2426- 5 -LRB104 10274 RLC 20348 b1paragraph (1) of this subsection (j), when the victim is under 218 years of age at the time of the offense, a prosecution for 3failure of a person who is required to report an alleged or 4suspected commission of criminal sexual assault, aggravated 5criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual assault of 6a child, aggravated criminal sexual abuse, or felony criminal 7sexual abuse under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 8Act may be commenced within 20 years after the child victim 9attains 18 years of age.10    (3) When the victim is under 18 years of age at the time of 11the offense, a prosecution for misdemeanor criminal sexual 12abuse may be commenced within 10 years after the child victim 13attains 18 years of age.14    (4) Nothing in this subdivision (j) shall be construed to 15shorten a period within which a prosecution must be commenced 16under any other provision of this Section.17    (j-5) A prosecution for armed robbery, home invasion, 18kidnapping, or aggravated kidnaping may be commenced at any 19time if it arises out of the same course of conduct and meets 20the criteria under one of the offenses in subsection (j) of 21this Section.22    (k) (Blank). 23    (l) A prosecution for any offense set forth in Section 2426-4 of this Code may be commenced within one year after the 25discovery of the offense by the victim of that offense. 26    (l-5) A prosecution for any offense involving sexual   HB2426- 6 -LRB104 10274 RLC 20348 b1conduct or sexual penetration, as defined in Section 11-0.1 of 2this Code, in which the victim was 18 years of age or older at 3the time of the offense, may be commenced within one year after 4the discovery of the offense by the victim when corroborating 5physical evidence is available. The charging document shall 6state that the statute of limitations is extended under this 7subsection (l-5) and shall state the circumstances justifying 8the extension. Nothing in this subsection (l-5) shall be 9construed to shorten a period within which a prosecution must 10be commenced under any other provision of this Section or 11Section 3-5 of this Code. 12    (m) The prosecution shall not be required to prove at 13trial facts which extend the general limitations in Section 143-5 of this Code when the facts supporting extension of the 15period of general limitations are properly pled in the 16charging document. Any challenge relating to the extension of 17the general limitations period as defined in this Section 18shall be exclusively conducted under Section 114-1 of the Code 19of Criminal Procedure of 1963.20    (n) A prosecution for any offense set forth in subsection 21(a), (b), or (c) of Section 8A-3 or Section 8A-13 of the 22Illinois Public Aid Code, in which the total amount of money 23involved is $5,000 or more, including the monetary value of 24food stamps and the value of commodities under Section 16-1 of 25this Code may be commenced within 5 years of the last act 26committed in furtherance of the offense.  HB2426- 7 -LRB104 10274 RLC 20348 b1    (o) A prosecution for any offense based upon fraudulent 2activity connected to COVID-19-related relief programs, to 3include the Paycheck Protection Program, COVID-19 Economic 4Injury Disaster Loan Program, and the Unemployment Benefit 5Programs shall be commenced within 5 years after discovery of 6the offense by a person having a legal duty to report such 7offense, or in the absence of such discovery, within 5 years 8after the proper prosecuting officer becomes aware of the 9offense. However, in no such case is the period of limitation 10so extended more than 10 years beyond the expiration of the 11period otherwise applicable. 12    (p) A prosecution for drug-induced homicide may be 13commenced within 10 years after the commission of the offense. 14(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-184, eff. 1-1-24.)